Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 8.2 Certificate of Recovery & Re-Entry

13-8.2-1.
Certificate of recovery & re-entry established — Findings of the general assembly and purposes.

There is hereby established a certificate of recovery & re-entry for individuals that are convicted of a crime in which their legal status and ability to seek and maintain employment changes forever. A criminal record may prohibit individuals from successfully obtaining jobs, occupational licenses, housing and other benefits and opportunities available to all other individuals. These restrictions are often narrowly tailored and serve to protect society against an unidentified public safety risk, but others are arbitrary, unnecessary and without regard to any post-conviction rehabilitation or recovery & re-entry. Individuals who have successfully completed their board-imposed sentences need to be able to reestablish themselves as law-abiding members of society. At the same time, employers and other decision-makers need to have some reassurance of a person’s reliability. Therefore, the intent and purpose of this chapter is to provide a process that would, in select and appropriate cases, allow the issuance of a certificate of recovery & re-entry. Said certificate, if granted by the parole board, would serve to relieve the petitioner, in appropriate cases, of some of the collateral consequences resulting from his or her criminal record. Said certificate shall serve as one determining factor as to whether the petitioner has been successful in his or her rehabilitation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:

“Board” means the parole board within the Rhode Island department of corrections, established pursuant to the provisions of §

13-8-1

.

“Department” means the department of corrections.

“Director” means the director of the department of corrections.

“Eligible petitioner” means a person who has not been convicted of a crime or of an offense as defined in §

11-47-2(5)

and in RIGL subdivision

12-1.3-1(1)

who has not been convicted of more than one felony.

“Certificate of recovery & re-entry ” or “certificate” shall serve as one determining factor, consistent with concerns of public safety, of the person’s ability to obtain employment, professional licenses, housing and other benefits and opportunities. Provided, further, that said instrument shall serve as a determination that the person receiving it has successfully achieved his or her recovery & re-entry goals as provided for in §

13-8.2-4

.

“Conviction” notwithstanding the provisions of §

12-18-3

, means the imposition of a fine, period of incarceration whether or not suspended, probation or deferred sentence imposed after the entry of a plea of nolo contendere.

“Petition” means the motion, pleading, or other legal document or form seeking the issuance of a certificate of recovery & re-entry from the board.

“Felony” means a conviction of a felony in this state or of an offense, that is not a crime of violence, in any other jurisdiction for which a sentence to a term of imprisonment in excess of one year, was authorized. Criminal acts committed outside the state shall be classified as acts committed within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-3.
Rules of construction.

For the purposes of this chapter the following rules of construction, facts and circumstances shall apply:

Two (2) or more convictions of felonies charged in separate counts of one indictment or information shall be deemed to be one conviction;

Two (2) or more convictions of felonies charged in two (2) or more separate indictments or information, where disposition of all indictments or information takes place on the same date, shall be deemed to be one conviction; and

A plea or verdict of guilty upon which a sentence of probation, conditional discharge, or supervision has been imposed shall be deemed to be a conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-4.
Procedure for issuance of certificate.

The board shall have the following procedures for certificate of recovery & re-entry hearings:

To hear petitions from individuals seeking an order granting the issuance of a certificate of recovery & re-entry.

To establish the minimum period of recovery & re-entry for individuals referred to in subdivision (1) of this section, as follows:

Where the most serious crime of which the individual was convicted is a misdemeanor, the minimum period of recovery & re-entry shall be one year;

Where the most serious crime of which the individual was convicted is a non-violent felony conviction, the minimum period of recovery & re-entry shall be three (3) years; and

The minimum period of recovery & re-entry by the individual shall be measured either from the date of the payment of any fine imposed upon him or her, or from the date of his or her release from the institutional facility, custody by parole or home confinement, whichever is later.

To classify criminal acts committed outside the state as acts committed within the state based on the non violent nature of the criminal acts and the maximum sentence that could have been imposed based upon such conviction pursuant to the laws of such foreign jurisdiction.

To use its discretion as to the holding of an open hearing or an individual conference on any matter relevant to the granting of the application and the taking of testimony under oath.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-5.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall have the power to issue and establish criteria to determine eligibility for issuance of the certificate of recovery & re-entry;

By an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board to issue a certificate of recovery & re-entry to any person previously convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction;

To create all applications, and certificates necessary for the purposes of this chapter upon forms prescribed by the board. Such forms relating to certificates of recovery & re-entry shall be distributed by the chairman of the board;

To promulgate all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter; and

Any information contained within a certificate of recovery & re-entry as created in subsection (c) of this section shall be limited to:

The applicant’s name;

Date of birth;

Certificate number;

Issue date;

A statement that “The board has determined that up to and including the issue date stated above, this individual has met the necessary standards of recovery & re-entry to hold the certificate”; and

Authentication phone number for the department of corrections.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-6.
Limitations and restrictions of certificate.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed:

Destruction or sealing of criminal records pursuant to §

12-1-12

; or

Expungement of criminal records pursuant to §§

12-1.3-1

through 4; or

To alter or limit or affect the manner of applying for pardons to the Governor;

The certificate shall not to be deemed to prevent:

Any judicial proceeding, administrative, licensing or other body, or authority from relying upon the conviction specified in the certificate as the basis for the exercise of its discretionary power to suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license, permit, or other authority or privilege.

Or limit the introduction of evidence of a prior conviction for purposes of impeachment of a witness in a judicial or other proceeding where otherwise authorized by the applicable rules of evidence.

The enhancement from misdemeanor to felony when charging an individual with a criminal offense, subsequent to the conviction on which the certificate was issued, when a prior conviction mandates such enhancement of subsequent charges.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-7.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.

13-8.2-8.
Immunity for third-party individuals — Civil and criminal.

An individual or entity that denies employment, professional licensing, housing or other benefits or opportunities to a holder of a certificate of recovery & re-entry on the basis of a criminal records check shall not be liable for civil damages or subject to any claim, demand, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature as a result of such denial.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 412, § 1.